en: Sandwich made with wholemeal loaf bread and tuna and vegetables and mayonnaise
fr: Sandwich triangle thon crudités, Sandwich pain de mie complet thon crudités mayonnaise

en: Baguette sandwiches with tuna and vegetables and mayonnaise
fr: Sandwich baguette thon crudités mayonnaise

en: Baguette sandwiches with tuna and sweet corn and vegetables
fr: Sandwich baguette thon-crudités maïs

en: Salmon sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи със сьомга
fr: Sandwichs au saumon, sandwich saumon fumé, sandwichs au saumon fumé, sandwich au saumon fumé
hr: Sendviči sa lososom
nl: Zalmsandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de salmão

en: Baguette Sandwich with smoked salmon
fr: Sandwich baguette au saumon fumé

en: Surimi sandwiches
de: Surimi-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de surimi
fr: Sandwichs au surimi
hr: Surimi sendviči
it: Panini al surimi
nl: Surimisandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de surimi
zh: 蟹肉棒三明治

en: Egg sandwiches
de: Eiersandwiches
es: Bocadillos de huevo
fr: Sandwich aux œufs
hr: Sendviči s jajima
it: Panini all'uovo
nl: Sandwiches met ei
pt: Sanduíches de ovo
ru: Бутерброды с яйцом

en: Wraps
fr: Wraps, Wrap, roulade
hr: Oblozi
nl: Wraps

en: Chicken wraps
de: Hähnchen-Wraps
es: Wraps de pollo
fr: Wraps au poulet
hr: Zamotuljke od piletine
it: Wraps di pollo
nl: Kippenwraps, Wraps met kip

en: Fried chicken wraps
de: Gebratene Hähnchen-Wraps
es: Wraps de pollo frito
fr: Wraps au poulet frit
hr: Zamotuljke od pržene piletine
it: Wraps di pollo fritto
nl: Gefrituurde kip wraps
pt: Wraps de frango frito

en: Ham wraps
de: Schinken-Wraps
es: Wraps de jamón
fr: Wraps au jambon
hr: Zamotuljke od šunke
it: Wraps al prosciutto
nl: Ham wraps
pt: Wraps de presunto

en: Ham and goat cheese wraps
de: Schinken und Ziegenkäse Wraps
es: Wraps de jamón y queso de cabra
fr: Wraps Jambon Chèvre
hr: Zamotuljke od šunke i kozjeg sira
it: Wraps di prosciutto e formaggio di capra
nl: Ham en geitenkaas wraps
pt: Wraps de presunto e queijo de cabra

en: Vegetarian wraps, Wheat tortilla wrap filled with soy-based vegetarian
de: Vegetarische Wraps
es: Wraps vegetarianos
fr: Wraps végétariens, Wrap végétarien
hr: Vegetarijanske obloge
it: Wraps vegetariani
nl: vegetarische wraps
pt: Wraps vegetarianos

en: Vegetable wraps
fr: Wraps aux légumes

en: Frozen vegetable wraps
fr: Wraps aux légumes surgelés

en: Seafood, sea foods
bg: Морска храна
ca: Marisc
cs: Mořské plody
da: Fisk og skaldyr
de: Fisch und Meeresfrüchte
es: Productos del mar
fi: merenelävät
fr: Produits de la mer, produit de la mer, Fruits de mer
he: פירות ים
hr: plodovi mora
hu: Tenger gyümölcsei, Tengeri ételek
it: Frutti di mare
ja: シーフード, 水産物, 海産物
nl: Vis en zeevruchten
pl: Owoce morza
pt: Frutos do mar
ru: Рыба и морепродукты
th: อาหารทะเล
tr: Deniz ürünleri
zh: 海鲜

en: Armenian sea products
fr: Produits de la mer arméniens
hr: Armenski morski proizvodi
hy: Հայկական ծովային ապրանքներ
ru: Армянские морские продукты

hy: ՍԵՒԱՆԻ ԻՇԽԱՆ, SEVANI ISHKHAN
en: Sevan trout

en: Belgian sea products
de: Belgische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar belgas
fr: Produits de la mer belges
hr: Belgijski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici belgi

en: Brazilian sea products
es: Productos del mar brasileños
fr: Produits de la mer brésiliens
hr: Brazilski morski proizvodi
pt: Produtos do mar brasileiros
ru: Бразильские морепродукты